Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; BUILDING STRONG COMMUNITIES, INC.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of labor and industry for a grant to Building Strong Communities, Inc. for a statewide apprenticeship readiness program that prepares women; individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and People of Color; and veterans to enter the building and construction industries. These appropriations are onetime. new text end